trunk/apertium-eo-es/apertium-eo-es.eo.dix
<pardef n="CX__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="one__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

 

<pardef n="du__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cent</l>      <r>cent<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cent</l>      <r>cent<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cent</l>      <r>cent<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>mil</l>   <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>mil</l>   <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>mil</l>   <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cent<b/>mil</l><r>cent<b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cent<b/>mil</l><r>cent<b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cent<b/>mil</l><r>cent<b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>o</l>         <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>oj</l>        <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>on</l>        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ojn</l>       <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="million__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="dudek__num">
<!-- per als 21 33 44 etc -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>unu</l>   <r><b/>unu</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>du</l>    <r><b/>du</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>tri</l>   <r><b/>tri</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>kvar</l>  <r><b/>kvar</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>kvin</l>  <r><b/>kvin</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>ses</l>   <r><b/>ses</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>sep</l>   <r><b/>sep</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>ok</l>    <r><b/>ok</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>naŭ</l>   <r><b/>naŭ</r></p><par n="du__num"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="prsubj__prn">
<!-- EO -->
      
  <e>       <p><l>mi</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vi</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>vi</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>vi</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e c="para las reglas de agradar del t2x, por el momento"><p><l>li</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>li</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ŝi</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ĝi</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ni</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ili</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="si__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>si</l>          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sin</l>          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>unu<b/>la<b/>alian</l>          <r>unu<b/>la<b/>alian<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="probj__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>min</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vin</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>vin</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>vin</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lin</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ŝin</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ĝin</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onin</l>      <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nin</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ilin</l>      <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kial__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e lm="pronoms personals de subjecte"><i></i><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
<e lm="pronoms personals d'objecte"><i></i><par n="probj__prn"/></e>
<e lm="si">             <i></i><par n="si__prn"/></e>
<e lm="cent">            <i>cent</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek">             <i>dek</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek du">          <i>dek<b/>du</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek kvar">        <i>dek<b/>kvar</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek kvin">        <i>dek<b/>kvin</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek naŭ">         <i>dek<b/>naŭ</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek ok">          <i>dek<b/>ok</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek sep">         <i>dek<b/>sep</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek ses">         <i>dek<b/>ses</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek tri">         <i>dek<b/>tri</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dek unu">         <i>dek<b/>unu</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="C">                    <i>C</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="D">                    <i>D</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="I">                    <i>I</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="II">                   <i>II</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="III">                  <i>III</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="IV">                   <i>IV</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="IX">                   <i>IX</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="L">                    <i>L</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="M">                    <i>M</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="V">                    <i>V</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="VI">                   <i>VI</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="VII">                  <i>VII</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="VIII">                 <i>VIII</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="X">                    <i>X</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="XI">                   <i>XI</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="XII">                  <i>XII</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="XIII">                 <i>XIII</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="XIV">                  <i>XIV</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="XIX">                  <i>XIX</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="XV">                   <i>XV</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="XVI">                  <i>XVI</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="XVII">                 <i>XVII</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="XVIII">                <i>XVIII</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="XX">                   <i>XX</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="XXI">                  <i>XXI</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="du">              <i>du</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="dudek">           <i>dudek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
<e lm="kial">            <i>kial</i><par n="kial__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kiam">            <i>kiam</i><par n="kial__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kie">             <i>kie</i><par n="kial__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kien">            <i>kien</i><par n="kial__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kiom">            <i>kiom</i><par n="kial__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kvar">            <i>kvar</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="kvardek">         <i>kvardek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
<e lm="kvin">            <i>kvin</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="kvindek">         <i>kvindek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
<e lm="mil">             <i>mil</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="miliono">         <i>miliono</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="naŭ">             <i>naŭ</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="naŭdek">          <i>naŭdek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
<e lm="nul">             <i>nul</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="nulo">            <i>nulo</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="ok">              <i>ok</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="okdek">           <i>okdek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
<e lm="sep">             <i>sep</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="sepdek">          <i>sepdek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
<e lm="ses">             <i>ses</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="sesdek">          <i>sesdek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
<e lm="tri">             <i>tri</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="tridek">          <i>tridek</i><par n="dudek__num"/></e>
<e lm="unu">             <i>unu</i><par n="du__num"/></e>
<e lm="ĉu">              <i>ĉu</i><par n="kial__adv"/></e>
